Illinois, session 104th, SB4031.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by adding Section 522-112 and changing Section 27A-5 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-112 new)7    Sec. 22-112. Bullying accountability.8    (a) This Section applies to:9        (1) minors enrolled in kindergarten through grade 12; 10    and11        (2) incidents of bullying that occur at school, at 12    school-sponsored activities, during transportation to or 13    from school, or in digital or online contexts if the 14    bullying interferes with school or victim attendance.15    (b) As used in this Section:16    "Bullying" has the meaning given to that term in 17subsection (b) of Section 22-110. "Bullying" includes 18cyberbullying, school bullying, and community bullying.19    "Bullying offense of major severity" means repeated 20bullying, assault, or cyberbullying with serious harm.21    "Community bullying" means bullying occurring in 22off-campus locations, such as neighborhoods and recreation 23centers, but still affecting minors in educational settings.  SB4031- 2 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1    "Minor offender" means an individual under 18 years of age 2who has committed bullying.3    "Parent or guardian" means the parent or legal guardian 4responsible for a minor's welfare.5    "Restorative justice program" means a court-supervised or 6school-supervised process in which a minor offender engages 7with the victim, apologizes, and participates in community 8service or mediation.9    "School" means a public school, including a charter 10school.11    "School bullying" means bullying that occurs on school 12property, during school activities, or during transportation 13to or from school.14    (c) A school shall collaborate with courts, juvenile 15justice systems, and mental health agencies to implement the 16requirements of this Section.17    (d) After an offense of bullying occurs and is reported to 18a school, the following measures shall be taken to remedy the 19bullying offense:20        (1) For a first bullying offense or a bullying offense 21    of low severity:22            (A) a minor offender shall:23                (i) appear at a juvenile hearing or designated 24            court within 30 days after the bullying offense is 25            reported;26                (ii) participate in a compulsory,   SB4031- 3 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1            school-based, restorative-justice program for 4 2            weeks;3                (iii) write a letter of apology to the victim 4            and create a video delivery of the apology, with 5            oversight;6                (iv) perform 10 to 20 hours of community 7            service at the minor offender's school or in the 8            minor offender's community; and9                (v) attend at least one mandatory counseling 10            session;11            (B) the parent or guardian of the minor offender 12        shall:13                (i) attend the juvenile hearing or court under 14            item (i) of subparagraph (A) with the minor 15            offender;16                (ii) pay an administrative fee of $250 to the 17            Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying Prevention 18            Fund; and19                (iii) attend at least one parent or guardian 20            education session about bullying, mental health, 21            or digital citizenship; and22            (C) the victim of the minor offender shall:23                (i) receive free counseling; and24                (ii) have the victim's attendance, grades, and 25            self-reported mental health monitored for 90 days 26            following the report of the bullying offense.  SB4031- 4 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1        (2) For a second bullying offense or a bullying 2    offense of moderate severity:3            (A) a minor offender shall:4                (i) appear at a juvenile hearing or designated 5            court within 30 days after the bullying offense is 6            reported;7                (ii) participate in a compulsory, 8            school-based, restorative-justice program for 8 9            weeks;10                (iii) perform 30 to 50 hours of community 11            service at the minor offender's school or in the 12            minor offender's community;13                (iv) attend mandatory counseling sessions 14            every 2 weeks for 3 months; and15                (v) lose select extracurricular participation, 16            as determined by the school, for a semester;17            (B) the parent or guardian of the minor offender 18        shall:19                (i) attend the juvenile hearing or court under 20            item (i) of subparagraph (A) with the minor 21            offender;22                (ii) pay an administrative fee of $500 to the 23            Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying Prevention 24            Fund; and25                (iii) attend a full day of a parent or 26            guardian education session about bullying, mental   SB4031- 5 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1            health, or digital citizenship and sign a 2            behavioral contract with the school regarding the 3            minor offender's behavior; and4            (C) the victim of the minor offender shall:5                (i) receive free counseling and enhanced 6            support for 6 months; and7                (ii) create, with the school and the victim's 8            parent or guardian, a student-safety plan.9        (3) For a third bullying offense or a bullying offense 10    of major severity:11            (A) a minor offender shall:12                (i) appear at a juvenile hearing or designated 13            court within 30 days after the bullying offense is 14            reported, when may result in a court filing and 15            detention or a supervised program;16                (ii) participate in a compulsory, 17            school-based, restorative-justice program for at 18            least 3 months;19                (iii) perform at least 100 hours of community 20            service at the minor offender's school or in the 21            minor offender's community; and22                (iv) attend mandatory counseling sessions for 23            at least 6 months;24            (B) at the school's discretion, the minor offender 25        may be expelled from the school and transferred to an 26        alternative program with a mandatory credits catch-up   SB4031- 6 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1        clause;2            (C) the parent or guardian of the minor offender 3        shall:4                (i) attend the juvenile hearing or court under 5            item (i) of subparagraph (A) with the minor 6            offender and any juvenile court date, if 7            applicable; the parent or guardian has a legal 8            obligation to bring the minor offender to any 9            juvenile court date, and if the parent or guardian 10            fails to do so, the court may hold the parent or 11            guardian in contempt;12                (ii) pay an administrative fee of $1,000 to 13            the Illinois Bullying and Cyberbullying Prevention 14            Fund; and15                (iii) pay for the victim's therapy and any 16            credit make-up program, if applicable; and17            (D) the victim of the minor offender shall receive 18        free counseling, free educational tutoring, free 19        mentoring, and free wellness-check insurance for at 20        least 12 months.21    (e) A school shall provide student and parent or guardian 22education sessions covering bullying, mental health, digital 23citizenship, and bystander intervention; crisis-intervention 24teams and access to counselors; and reintegration services for 25minor offenders, including catch-up courses and community 26service reflection.  SB4031- 7 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1    (f) Any money provided to a school under this Section from 2a federal grant shall be used for school-based, anti-bullying 3initiatives, mental health services, reintegration programs 4for minor offenders, and peer mentorship. Any funding received 5under this Section from a federal grant is contingent on 6compliance with the reporting requirements under subsection 7(g).8    (g) The State Board shall annually report to the School 9Crime Supplement to the National Crime Victimization Survey of 10the National Center for Education Statistics any incidents of 11bullying, the number of hearings relating to incidents of 12bullying, restorative-justice program outcomes, disciplinary 13actions, and follow-up metrics, such as attendance, grades, 14and mental health surveys, by demographics, such as ages and 15types of schools.16    (h) The State Board shall annually audit schools that 17participate in the restorative measures under subsection (d) 18to determine anti-bullying metrics for the report required 19under subsection (g). 20    Section 10. The School Code is amended by changing Section 2127A-5 as follows: 22    (105 ILCS 5/27A-5)23    Sec. 27A-5. Charter school; legal entity; requirements. 24    (a) A charter school shall be a public, nonsectarian,   SB4031- 8 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1nonreligious, non-home based, and non-profit school. A charter 2school shall be organized and operated as a nonprofit 3corporation or other discrete, legal, nonprofit entity 4authorized under the laws of the State of Illinois.5    (b) A charter school may be established under this Article 6by creating a new school or by converting an existing public 7school or attendance center to charter school status. In all 8new applications to establish a charter school in a city 9having a population exceeding 500,000, operation of the 10charter school shall be limited to one campus. This limitation 11does not apply to charter schools existing or approved on or 12before April 16, 2003.13    (b-5) (Blank). 14    (c) A charter school shall be administered and governed by 15its board of directors or other governing body in the manner 16provided in its charter. The governing body of a charter 17school shall be subject to the Freedom of Information Act and 18the Open Meetings Act. A charter school's board of directors 19or other governing body must include at least one parent or 20guardian of a pupil currently enrolled in the charter school 21who may be selected through the charter school or a charter 22network election, appointment by the charter school's board of 23directors or other governing body, or by the charter school's 24Parent Teacher Organization or its equivalent. 25    (c-5) No later than January 1, 2021 or within the first 26year of his or her first term, every voting member of a charter   SB4031- 9 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1school's board of directors or other governing body shall 2complete a minimum of 4 hours of professional development 3leadership training to ensure that each member has sufficient 4familiarity with the board's or governing body's role and 5responsibilities, including financial oversight and 6accountability of the school, evaluating the principal's and 7school's performance, adherence to the Freedom of Information 8Act and the Open Meetings Act, and compliance with education 9and labor law. In each subsequent year of his or her term, a 10voting member of a charter school's board of directors or 11other governing body shall complete a minimum of 2 hours of 12professional development training in these same areas. The 13training under this subsection may be provided or certified by 14a statewide charter school membership association or may be 15provided or certified by other qualified providers approved by 16the State Board. 17    (d) For purposes of this subsection (d), "non-curricular 18health and safety requirement" means any health and safety 19requirement created by statute or rule to provide, maintain, 20preserve, or safeguard safe or healthful conditions for 21students and school personnel or to eliminate, reduce, or 22prevent threats to the health and safety of students and 23school personnel. "Non-curricular health and safety 24requirement" does not include any course of study or 25specialized instructional requirement for which the State 26Board has established goals and learning standards or which is   SB4031- 10 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1designed primarily to impart knowledge and skills for students 2to master and apply as an outcome of their education.3    A charter school shall comply with all non-curricular 4health and safety requirements applicable to public schools 5under the laws of the State of Illinois. The State Board shall 6promulgate and post on its Internet website a list of 7non-curricular health and safety requirements that a charter 8school must meet. The list shall be updated annually no later 9than September 1. Any charter contract between a charter 10school and its authorizer must contain a provision that 11requires the charter school to follow the list of all 12non-curricular health and safety requirements promulgated by 13the State Board and any non-curricular health and safety 14requirements added by the State Board to such list during the 15term of the charter. Nothing in this subsection (d) precludes 16an authorizer from including non-curricular health and safety 17requirements in a charter school contract that are not 18contained in the list promulgated by the State Board, 19including non-curricular health and safety requirements of the 20authorizing local school board. 21    (e) Except as otherwise provided in the School Code, a 22charter school shall not charge tuition; provided that a 23charter school may charge reasonable fees for textbooks, 24instructional materials, and student activities.25    (f) A charter school shall be responsible for the 26management and operation of its fiscal affairs, including, but   SB4031- 11 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1not limited to, the preparation of its budget. An audit of each 2charter school's finances shall be conducted annually by an 3outside, independent contractor retained by the charter 4school. The contractor shall not be an employee of the charter 5school or affiliated with the charter school or its authorizer 6in any way, other than to audit the charter school's finances. 7To ensure financial accountability for the use of public 8funds, on or before December 1 of every year of operation, each 9charter school shall submit to its authorizer and the State 10Board a copy of its audit and a copy of the Form 990 the 11charter school filed that year with the federal Internal 12Revenue Service. In addition, if deemed necessary for proper 13financial oversight of the charter school, an authorizer may 14require quarterly financial statements from each charter 15school. 16    (g) A charter school shall comply with all provisions of 17this Article, the Illinois Educational Labor Relations Act, 18all federal and State laws and rules applicable to public 19schools that pertain to special education and the instruction 20of English learners, and its charter. A charter school is 21exempt from all other State laws and regulations in this Code 22governing public schools and local school board policies; 23however, a charter school is not exempt from the following:24        (1) Sections 10-21.9 and 34-18.5 of this Code 25    regarding criminal history records checks and checks of 26    the Statewide Sex Offender Database and Statewide Murderer   SB4031- 12 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1    and Violent Offender Against Youth Database of applicants 2    for employment;3        (2) Sections 10-20.14, 10-22.6, 22-100, 24-24, 34-19, 4    and 34-84a of this Code regarding discipline of students;5        (3) the Local Governmental and Governmental Employees 6    Tort Immunity Act;7        (4) Section 108.75 of the General Not For Profit 8    Corporation Act of 1986 regarding indemnification of 9    officers, directors, employees, and agents;10        (5) the Abused and Neglected Child Reporting Act;11        (5.5) subsection (b) of Section 10-23.12 and 12    subsection (b) of Section 34-18.6 of this Code;13        (6) the Illinois School Student Records Act;14        (7) Section 10-17a of this Code regarding school 15    report cards;16        (8) the P-20 Longitudinal Education Data System Act;17        (9) Section 22-110 of this Code regarding bullying 18    prevention;19        (10) Section 2-3.162 of this Code regarding student 20    discipline reporting;21        (11) Sections 22-80 and 22-105 of this Code;22        (12) Sections 10-20.60 and 34-18.53 of this Code;23        (13) Sections 10-20.63 and 34-18.56 of this Code;24        (14) Sections 22-90 and 26-18 of this Code;25        (15) Section 22-30 of this Code; 26        (16) Sections 24-12 and 34-85 of this Code;  SB4031- 13 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1        (17) the Seizure Smart School Act;2        (18) Section 2-3.64a-10 of this Code;3        (19) Sections 10-20.73 and 34-21.9 of this Code;4        (20) Section 10-22.25b of this Code;5        (21) Section 27-1015 of this Code;6        (22) Section 27-1010 of this Code; 7        (23) Section 34-18.8 of this Code; 8        (24) Article 26A of this Code;9        (25) Section 2-3.188 of this Code;10        (26) Section 22-85.5 of this Code; 11        (27) subsections (d-10), (d-15), and (d-20) of Section 12    10-20.56 of this Code; 13        (28) Sections 10-20.83 and 34-18.78 of this Code; 14        (29) Section 10-20.13 of this Code; 15        (30) (blank); 16        (31) Section 34-21.6 of this Code;17        (32) Section 22-85.10 of this Code; 18        (33) Section 2-3.196 of this Code; 19        (34) Section 22-95 of this Code; 20        (35) Section 34-18.62 of this Code;21        (36) the Illinois Human Rights Act; 22        (37) Section 2-3.204 of this Code; and23        (38) Section 22-106 22-105 of this Code; and . 24        (39) Section 22-112 of this Code. 25    The change made by Public Act 96-104 to this subsection 26(g) is declaratory of existing law.  SB4031- 14 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1    (h) A charter school may negotiate and contract with a 2school district, the governing body of a State college or 3university or public community college, or any other public or 4for-profit or nonprofit private entity for: (i) the use of a 5school building and grounds or any other real property or 6facilities that the charter school desires to use or convert 7for use as a charter school site, (ii) the operation and 8maintenance thereof, and (iii) the provision of any service, 9activity, or undertaking that the charter school is required 10to perform in order to carry out the terms of its charter. 11Except as provided in subsection (i) of this Section, a school 12district may charge a charter school reasonable rent for the 13use of the district's buildings, grounds, and facilities. Any 14services for which a charter school contracts with a school 15district shall be provided by the district at cost. Any 16services for which a charter school contracts with a local 17school board or with the governing body of a State college or 18university or public community college shall be provided by 19the public entity at cost.20    (i) In no event shall a charter school that is established 21by converting an existing school or attendance center to 22charter school status be required to pay rent for space that is 23deemed available, as negotiated and provided in the charter 24agreement, in school district facilities. However, all other 25costs for the operation and maintenance of school district 26facilities that are used by the charter school shall be   SB4031- 15 -LRB104 17640 LNS 31071 b1subject to negotiation between the charter school and the 2local school board and shall be set forth in the charter.3    (j) A charter school may limit student enrollment by age 4or grade level.5    (k) If the charter school is authorized by the State 6Board, then the charter school is its own local education 7agency. 8(Source: P.A. 103-154, eff. 6-30-23; 103-175, eff. 6-30-23; 9103-472, eff. 8-1-24; 103-605, eff. 7-1-24; 103-641, eff. 107-1-24; 103-806, eff. 1-1-25; 104-288, eff. 1-1-26; 104-391, 11eff. 8-15-25; 104-417, eff. 8-15-25; revised 9-12-25.)